Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3107
Certificate of authority; issued, when; minimum number of applications and annual premiums.

No professional association mutual insurance company shall be issued a certificate of authority to do any business in this state until it has received not less than two hundred applications for insurance, and it shall have received in cash one annual premium for each such application.

Laws 1978, LB 656, § 7.